Maryland, session 2025, SB0594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–3101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Program” means the Overdose Response Program.
13–3103.
(b) The Department may:
(1) Collect fees necessary for the administration of the Program;
(2) Authorize private or public entities to conduct education and training
on opioid overdose recognition and response that include:
(i) Education on recognizing the signs and symptoms of an opioid
overdose;
(ii) Training on responding to an opioid overdose, including the
administration of opioid overdose reversal drugs approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration, EMPHASIZING THE RESTORATION OF BREATHING, AVOIDING
WITHDRAWAL, AND COMPASSIONATE POSTOVERDOSE SUPPORT AND CARE; and

SENATE BILL 594 3
(iii) Access to opioid overdose reversal drugs approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration and the necessary supplies for the administration of the
opioid overdose reversal drugs;
(3) Develop guidance regarding the content of educational training
programs conducted by private or public entities; and
(4) Collect and report data on the operation and results of the programs.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–331.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Opioid Restitution Fund.
(b) There is an Opioid Restitution Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to retain the amount of settlement revenues
deposited to the Fund in accordance with subsection (e)(1) of this section.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
this subtitle.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all revenues received by the State from any source resulting, directly or
indirectly, from any judgment against, or settlement with, opioid manufacturers, opioid
research associations, or any other person in the opioid industry relating to any claims
made or prosecuted by the State to recover damages for violations of State law; and
(2) the interest earnings of the Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only to provide funds for THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED
IN SETTLEMENT AGREEMENTS AND JUDGMENTS RELATING TO CLAIMS BY THE
STATE AGAINST OPIOID MANUFACTURERS, OPIOID RESEARCH ASSOCIATIONS, OR
ANY OTHER PERSON IN THE OPIOID INDUSTRY FOR VIOLATIONS OF STATE LAW,
INCLUDING:
(1) programs, services, supports, and resources for evidence–based
substance use disorder prevention, treatment, recovery, or harm reduction that have the
purpose of:;

SENATE BILL 594
(i) improving access to medications proven to prevent or reverse an
overdose, including by supporting the initiative to co–locate naloxone with automated
external defibrillators placed in public buildings under § 13–518 of the Education Article;
(ii) supporting peer support specialists and screening, brief
intervention, and referral to treatment services for hospitals, correctional facilities, and
other high–risk populations;
(iii) increasing access to medications that support recovery from
substance use disorders; AND
(iv) expanding the Heroin Coordinator Program, including for
administrative expenses;
[(v) expanding access to crisis beds and residential treatment
services for adults and minors;
(vi) expanding and establishing safe stations, mobile crisis response
systems, and crisis stabilization centers;
(vii) supporting the behavioral health crisis hotline;
(viii) organizing primary and secondary school education campaigns
to prevent opioid use, including for administrative expenses;
(ix) enforcing the laws regarding opioid prescriptions and sales,
including for administrative expenses;
(x) research regarding and training for substance use treatment and
overdose prevention, including for administrative expenses; and
(xi) supporting and expanding other evidence–based interventions
for overdose prevention and substance use treatment;]
(2) supporting community–based nonprofit recovery organizations that
provide nonclinical substance use recovery support services in the State;
(3) ADDRESSING RACIAL DISPARITIES IN ACCESS TO PREVENTION,
HARM REDUCTION, TREATMENT, AND RECOVERY SUPPORT SERVICES;
(4) ADDRESSING SOCIOECONOMIC DISPARITIES IN ACCESS TO
PREVENTION, HARM REDUCTION, TREATMENT, AND RECOVERY SUPPORT SERVICES;
(5) evidence–informed substance use disorder prevention, treatment
recovery, or harm reduction pilot programs or demonstration studies that are not

SENATE BILL 594 5
evidence–based if the Opioid Restitution Fund Advisory Council, established under §
7.5–902 of the Health – General Article:
(i) determines that emerging evidence supports the distribution of
money for the pilot program or that there is a reasonable basis for funding the
demonstration study with the expectation of creating an evidence–based program; and
(ii) approves the use of money for the pilot program or demonstration
study; and
[(4)] (5) (6) evaluations of the effectiveness and outcomes reporting for
substance use disorder abatement infrastructure, programs, services, supports, and
resources for which money from the Fund was used, including evaluations of the impact on
access to harm reduction services or treatment for substance use disorders and the
reduction in drug–related mortality.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.